Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF629.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SECOND HARVEST HEARTLAND; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin (a) $1,950,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,950,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture for grants to Second Harvest Heartland on behalf of Minnesota's five Feeding America food banks for the following purposes: new text end new text begin (1) at least $850,000 each year must be allocated to purchase milk for distribution to Minnesota's food shelves and other charitable organizations that are eligible to receive food from the food banks. Milk purchased under the grants must be acquired from Minnesota milk processors and based on low-cost bids. The milk must be allocated to each Feeding America food bank serving Minnesota according to the formula used in the distribution of United States Department of Agriculture commodities under The Emergency Food Assistance Program. Second Harvest Heartland may enter into contracts or agreements with food banks for shared funding or reimbursement of the direct purchase of milk. Each food bank that receives funding under this clause may use up to two percent for administrative expenses. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, any unencumbered balance the first year does not cancel and is available the second year; new text end new text begin (2) to compensate agricultural producers and processors for costs incurred to harvest and package for transfer surplus fruits, vegetables, and other agricultural commodities that would otherwise go unharvested, be discarded, or be sold in a secondary market. Surplus commodities must be distributed statewide to food shelves and other charitable organizations that are eligible to receive food from the food banks. Surplus food acquired under this clause must be from Minnesota producers and processors. Second Harvest Heartland may use up to 15 percent of each grant awarded under this clause for administrative and transportation expenses; new text end new text begin (3) to purchase and distribute protein products, including but not limited to pork, poultry, beef, dry legumes, cheese, and eggs to Minnesota's food shelves and other charitable organizations that are eligible to receive food from the food banks. Second Harvest Heartland may use up to two percent of each grant awarded under this clause for administrative expenses. Protein products purchased under the grants must be acquired from Minnesota processors and producers; and new text end new text begin (4) $500,000 each year is to purchase produce from The Good Acre. Second Harvest Heartland may use up to two percent of funding under this clause for administrative expenses. new text end new text begin (b) Second Harvest Heartland must submit quarterly reports to the commissioner and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over agriculture finance in the form prescribed by the commissioner. The reports must include but are not limited to information on the expenditure of funds, the amount of milk or other commodities purchased, and the organizations to which this food was distributed. The base for this appropriation is $1,950,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. new text end